Nebraska, session 109, LB449.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB449 LB449
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 39-1365.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
39-1365.01 (1) The department shall be responsible for developing a
specific and long-range state highway system plan. The department shall
annually formulate plans to meet the state highway system needs of all
facets of the state and shall assign priorities for such needs. The
department shall, on or before December 1 of each year, present such
plans and the report required in section 39-1365.02 to the Legislature.
The plans shall be referred to the appropriate standing committees of the
Legislature for review.
(2) The department shall consider the preservation of the existing
state highway system asset as its primary priority except as may
otherwise be provided in state or federal law. In establishing secondary
priorities, the department shall consider a variety of factors,
including, but not limited to, current and projected traffic volume,
safety requirements, economic development needs, current and projected
demographic trends, and enhancement of the quality of life for all
Nebraska citizens. The state highway system plan shall:
(a) Include include the designation of those portions of the state
highway system which shall be expressways; and .
(b) Account for highway revenue raised by each district specified in
section 39-1102. Not less than seventy percent of revenue raised in each
district shall be allocated to any project within the district.
Sec. 2. Original section 39-1365.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-